Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1835.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6312 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6312. Sexual abuse of children.* * *(d.2) Sentencing enhancement.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for the courts to consider in cases involving a violation of subsection (b), (c) or (d) if the child depicted was a descendant, including a stepchild, stepgrandchild, brother, sister, nephew, niece, cousin or other relative of the defendant.* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1835PN2258 - 2 - 1